Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2264.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2806.3. Virtual power plant program.(a) Program.--No later than July 1, 2027, the commission shall require each electric distribution company to develop and submit to the commission a proposal to implement a virtual power plant program consistent with this section.(b) Commission review and approval.--(1) The commission shall conduct a public hearing on a proposal submitted under subsection (a) and provide an opportunity for the Office of Consumer Advocate and other stakeholders to submit recommendations on the program 1234567891011121314151617 proposed by the electric distribution company.(2) THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY SHALL DEMONSTRATE THAT THE PROPOSAL IS COST EFFECTIVE USING A COST-BENEFIT ANALYSIS DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION, WHICH SHALL INCLUDE AN ANALYSIS OF THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY'S ESTIMATED ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS.(2) (3) The commission shall approve or disapprove a proposal submitted under subsection (a) within 180 days after submission. If the commission disapproves the proposal, all of the following shall apply:(i) The commission shall state in detail the reasons for the disapproval.(ii) The electric distribution company shall submit a revised proposal within 60 days after entry of an order disapproving the proposal. The revised proposal shall address the deficiencies identified by the commission. The commission shall approve or disapprove the revised proposal within 90 days after submission.(3) (4) A proposal submitted under subsection (a) shall include a reasonable enrollment target for the electric distribution company to achieve in collaboration with contracted third-party distributed energy resource management system providers and device installers. The enrollment target shall be sufficient to drive market participation.(c) Requirements.--A program shall harness distributed energy resources to provide system peak load demand reduction and other grid services. The program shall meet all of the following requirements:(1) Permit a customer with an eligible technology to enroll in the program through an aggregator or the electric 20260HB2264PN3369 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 distribution company.(2) To the extent practicable, include a mechanism to incorporate existing demand response programs.(3) (2) Provide compensable grid services for each eligible technology that a participant may provide, including local and system peak demand response and the avoidance or deferral of transmission or distribution upgrades or capacity expansion. The program may also include any of the following:(i) Clean peak service.(ii) Locational value.(iii) Voltage support and other ancillary services.(iv) Daily load shifting.(v) Emergency services.(vi) Other functions and grid services the commission determines support efficient planning and operation of the electrical grid.(4) (3) Establish operational parameters for grid services by distributed energy resource type, including all of the following:(i) The minimum and maximum number of grid events during which the electric distribution company OR PARTICIPATING AGGREGATOR may dispatch enrolled distributed energy resources.(ii) The months of the year during which a grid event may occur.(iii) The days of the week during which a grid event may occur.(iv) The times of day during which a grid event may occur.(v) A maximum duration of three hours for a grid 20260HB2264PN3369 - 3 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 event.(vi) Minimum advance notice of a grid event to participants, except that, as practicable, notice for an emergency event may be provided in less than 24 hours.(vii) Other information the commission determines necessary to operate the program efficiently.(5) (4) Provide for an aggregator to perform all of the following:(i) Participate in the program.(ii) Enroll and manage customer participation.(iii) Receive dispatch signals and other communications from the electric distribution company.(iv) Receive OR MANAGE performance-based compensation or other appropriate compensation from the electric distribution company.(6) (5) Provide for measurement and verification of battery performance directly from the inverter without requiring installation of an additional meter and provide other measurement standards for eligible technologies, subject to commission approval.(7) (6) Provide for an upfront payment, performance- based compensation or both for the full value of grid services at the locations where eligible technologies are utilized. The commission may approve reasonable mechanisms to disenroll a customer for continued nonperformance but may not impose a penalty for nonperformance . (8) (7) Provide enhanced upfront payments for low-income customers and customers located in historically disadvantaged communities in addition to performance-based compensation. The commission may approve enhanced upfront payment rates 20260HB2264PN3369 - 4 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under this paragraph and shall coordinate with State agency officials to make funding available from the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 (Public Law 117-169, 136 Stat. 1818) and other funding opportunities from the United States Department of Energy that may be used to provide enhanced upfront payments to certain customers.(9) (8) Permit a participant to maintain the performance- based rate applicable at the time of enrollment for a minimum of five years and permit the participant to reenroll after the five-year period at the applicable rate for additional five-year terms. (10) In addition to performance-based compensation, provide that each kilowatt hour of energy exported from an enrolled eligible technology under the program shall be credited to the enrolled customer at the full retail value at the time of export, regardless of the export compensation rate specified in the customer's current interconnection tariff. Nothing in this paragraph shall affect the rate of compensation for a customer-generator under the act of November 30, 2004 (P.L.1672, No.213), known as the Alternative Energy Portfolio Standards Act.(11) Prohibit exclusion from enrollment in the program based on receipt of other financial incentives from an electric distribution company. An enrolled customer shall remain eligible to receive Federal and State incentives in addition to compensation received for participating in the program.(9) PROHIBIT A PARTICIPANT FROM RECEIVING COMPENSATION UNDER THE PROGRAM FOR A GRID SERVICE THAT IS SIMULTANEOUSLY COMPENSATED UNDER A FEDERAL, REGIONAL TRANSMISSION 20260HB2264PN3369 - 5 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ORGANIZATION OR ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY DEMAND RESPONSE OR LOAD MANAGEMENT PROGRAM UNLESS THE GRID SERVICE IS SEPARATE AND DISTINCT FROM THOSE PERFORMED UNDER THE PROGRAM.(12) (10) Prohibit an electric distribution company from requiring collateral from a program participant.(11) ALLOW ELIGIBLE DEMAND RESPONSE RESOURCES LOCATED AT COMMERCIAL AND INDUSTRIAL SITES TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM.(d) Commission duties.--(1) The commission may approve, disapprove or modify a program and may modify an approved program after notice and a public hearing.(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL ENSURE THAT EACH PROGRAM DOES NOT INTERFERE WITH WHOLESALE ENERGY, CAPACITY OR ANCILLARY SERVICE MARKETS AND OPERATES IN A MANNER CONSISTENT WITH THE MARKET RULES OF THE REGIONAL TRANSMISSION ORGANIZATION IN WHICH THE APPLICABLE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY PARTICIPATES.(2) (3) The commission shall establish reasonable and appropriate standards to protect the interests of program participants, including requirements for registration forms, opt-out procedures, standard contract terms and conditions, payment terms, warranties and disclosure forms.(3) (4) The commission shall ensure an electric distribution company uses a transparent and competitive procurement process for aggregator virtual power plant services.(4) (5) The commission shall establish standards and procedures governing energy data held by participants and electric distribution companies that must be shared with 20260HB2264PN3369 - 6 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 aggregators or other third parties to ensure efficient operation of a program. An aggregator or other third party may not sell or use, for any other purpose, data gathered for program use.(5) (6) For good cause shown, the commission may delay, for a reasonable period, the deadline for an electric distribution company to comply with this section.(7) IN ADDITION TO RECEIVING PERFORMANCE-BASED COMPENSATION, THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT RULES OR PROMULGATE REGULATIONS TO COMPENSATE THE ENERGY EXPORTED FROM ENROLLED DEVICES AT A VALUE COMMENSURATE WITH THE BENEFITS PROVIDED TO THE ELECTRIC GRID AT THE TIME OF EXPORT.(8) THE COMMISSION SHALL REQUIRE EACH ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY TO USE ADVANCED METERING INFRASTRUCTURE HOURLY USAGE FOR THE FOLLOWING:(I) TO CALCULATE EACH CUSTOMER'S PEAK LOAD CONTRIBUTION AND NETWORK SERVICE PEAK LOAD CONTRIBUTION.(II) TO PERFORM A CUSTOMER'S LOAD SETTLEMENT IN THE REGIONAL TRANSMISSION ORGANIZATION IN WHICH THE APPLICABLE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY PARTICIPATES.(e) Competitive services.--A program shall be administered SERVICES.--(1) A PROGRAM SHALL BE ADMINISTERED in a manner that does not discriminate against or hinder the ability of a competitive aggregator to participate in the program or to offer comparable products or services to customers.(2) AN ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY MAY NOT PROMOTE OR ADVERTISE THE PROGRAM IN A MANNER THAT GIVES UNREASONABLE PREFERENCE TO THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY OVER COMPETITIVE AGGREGATOR OFFERINGS.20260HB2264PN3369 - 7 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) Electric distribution company eligibility.--An electric distribution company may offer program enrollment directly to a customer in addition to aggregator offerings. A resource owned by an electric distribution company shall not be eligible to participate in the program.(g) Contracts.--An electric distribution company shall contract with third-party distributed energy resource management system providers and device installers to assist with program implementation and customer enrollment. An electric distribution company may not delay program implementation due to a lack of public utility-owned third-party management system or device installer capability.(h) Cost recovery.--(1) An electric distribution company may recover, on a full and current basis from customers through a reconcilable adjustment clause under section 1307 (relating to sliding scale of rates; adjustments), all reasonable and prudent costs incurred to administer and implement a program approved by the commission under this section, including information technology costs or investments such as distributed energy resource management systems. The commission may allow a reasonable rate of return on payments made for grid services and shall consider the allowance when developing performance incentives under subsection (i).(2) The commission may permit an electric distribution company to recover prudently incurred costs associated with distributed energy resource rebates for new eligible technologies enrolled in the program.(3) The commission may introduce performance incentive mechanisms to encourage program spending efficiency.20260HB2264PN3369 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) THE COMMISSION MAY ESTABLISH ANNUAL CAPS ON THE TOTAL PROGRAM COSTS RECOVERABLE FROM RATEPAYERS IF THE RATE CAP IS IN THE PUBLIC INTEREST AND DOES NOT SIGNIFICANTLY REDUCE FUTURE PARTICIPATION IN THE PROGRAM.(i) Targets and incentives.--(1) The commission shall initiate a proceeding to develop electricity consumption reduction targets applicable to an electric distribution company for program utilization and corresponding incentives for achieving established peak reduction targets under paragraph (2). Targets and incentives established under this subsection shall take effect no later than one year after commission approval of the program under subsection (b).(2) Within 270 days after the effective date of this paragraph, the commission shall, by regulation or order, establish all of the following:(i) Annual electricity consumption reduction targets and performance targets for the system peak reduction service designed to increase over time.(ii) Corresponding performance incentives for meeting the target established for each year of the performance period.(iii) Financial awards equal to or greater than the rate of return generated from traditional public utility capital investment required to meet the targets of the performance incentives established under this subsection.(iv) (III) Financial penalties for failure to meet targets established under this subsection.(v) (IV) New targets for subsequent five-year periods.20260HB2264PN3369 - 9 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vi) (V) Additional targets and incentives for each additional grid service adopted and approved for implementation under subsection (c).(j) Report.--By July 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, an electric distribution company shall submit to the commission an annual report on overall program performance and the program's impact on participants and customers. The report shall include all of the following:(1) Total capacity enrolled under the program approved under this section by customer class, reported separately by eligible technology type.(2) System peak reduction attributable to the program.(3) Contributions to other grid services made by the program.(4) AN EVALUATION OF THE COST EFFECTIVENESS OF EXPENDITURES.(4) (5) Recommendations to increase program participation.(5) (6) Other information requested by the commission. (k) Applicability.--This section shall not apply to an electric distribution company with less than 100,000 customers.(l) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Aggregator." An individual or entity, including an electric generation supplier or conservation service provider, that participates, enrolls customers or provides virtual power plant services in the virtual power plant program and coordinates the operation of enrolled devices."Battery." An energy storage device and associated equipment 20260HB2264PN3369 - 10 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that operates together to comply with program requirements."Device." A piece of equipment that is an eligible technology owned by a participant."Distributed energy resource." An eligible technology device A TECHNOLOGY located behind the customer's meter that provides energy or energy management capabilities for the customer or the grid. The term includes battery storage, smart thermostats, smart water heaters, electric vehicle charging equipment, electric vehicle batteries and controllable loads, including controllable loads and devices located at residential, commercial and industrial sites, as well as in front of the meter resources on the distribution system."Eligible technology." Technology A DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCE owned by a customer or third party and installed behind the customer's meter that is capable of being activated or dispatched under a virtual power plant program to address a grid event. The term includes energy storage systems, solar photovoltaic devices, smart thermostats, heat pumps, electric vehicles and chargers and demand response resources."Emergency event." A grid event identified by an electric distribution company for which notice is given in less than 24 hours."Energy storage system." A resource capable of receiving electric energy from the grid and storing it for later injection of electric energy back to the grid."Enrolled customer." A customer that participates in the program through an aggregator or the electric distribution company."Enrolled resource." An eligible technology enrolled in the program.20260HB2264PN3369 - 11 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Full retail value." The value of electric energy credited to a participant at the retail rate, including the generation, capacity, transmission and distribution components of the electric distribution company's approved tariff."Grid event." A grid condition or shortage of electricity supply for which the electric distribution company schedules or remotely dispatches enrolled resources."Grid service." A capacity, energy or ancillary service OR SERVICE RELATING TO THE TRANSMISSION OR DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM that supports grid operations."Historically disadvantaged community." An area, municipality or part of a municipality where at least 20% of the population has been below the Federal poverty income level as defined by the United States Department of Health and Human Services for at least 30 years."Participant." An owner of an eligible technology enrolled in a program."Performance-based compensation." A system of payments made to participants based on the value of electricity dispatched or saved through activating enrolled resources during a grid event . , WHICH MAY INCLUDE A RESERVATION PAYMENT PER KILOWATT OR PERFORMANCE PAYMENT PER KILOWATT HOUR OR BOTH."Performance-based rate." The performance-based compensation rate paid to participants based on the performance of enrolled resources providing one or more grid services during a grid event."Program." A virtual power plant program established under this section."Upfront payment." A one-time payment issued at the time of enrollment.20260HB2264PN3369 - 12 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Virtual power plant." An aggregation of distributed energy resources enrolled through an aggregator or an electric distribution company that are operated in coordination to provide one or more grid services.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2264PN3369 - 13 - 12345